fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON astâw-
astâw-/:astâw/ -ê2 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/1 [2/145429]

LEXICON astê-
astê-/:astê/ -ah1 "weight: 23.439125" ; ! n=2/103 [0/145429]
astê-/:astê/ -ahw1 "weight: 24.132272" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]
astê-/:astê/ -h "weight: 23.439125" ; ! n=2/103 [0/145429]
astê-/:astê/ -n1 "weight: 24.132272" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]
astê-/:astê/ -n3 "weight: 24.132272" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]
astê-/:astê/ -si "weight: 24.132272" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]
astê-/:astê/ -w1 "weight: 24.132272" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]
astê-/:astê/ -ê1 "weight: 24.132272" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]
@R.class.II@astê-+Der/V:@R.class.II@astê VII-v "weight: 11.381546" ; ! n=85/103 (VII-2v) [504/145429]
@R.class.II@astê-+Der/V:@R.class.II@astê VII-v-PL "weight: 16.887719" ; ! n=6/103 (VII-2v) [29/145429]
@R.class.TI@astê-+Der/V:@R.class.TI@astê VTI-ae "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/103 (VTI-2) [2/145429]
astê-/:astê/ wi "weight: 24.132272" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]

LEXICON asw-
asw-/:asw/ -ah1 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/26 [1/145429]
asw-/:asw/ -ahw1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/26 [1/145429]
asw-/:asw/ -h "weight: 24.861579" ; ! n=3/26 [0/145429]
asw-/:asw/ -m1 "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/26 [3/145429]
asw-/:asw/ -n1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/26 [1/145429]
asw-/:asw/ -êýi- "weight: 16.278453" ; ! n=8/26 [40/145429]
asw-/:asw/ -êýiht "weight: 16.922810" ; ! n=6/26 [28/145429]
asw-/:asw/ -êýim "weight: 18.868720" ; ! n=2/26 [12/145429]

LEXICON asâkîw-
asâkîw-+Der/N:asâkîw NA "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON asâm-
asâm-/:asâm/ -aw1 "weight: 26.980551" ; ! n=1/16 [0/145429]
asâm-/:asâm/ -ihk- "weight: 26.980551" ; ! n=1/16 [0/145429]
asâm-/:asâm/ -ihkê "weight: 26.980551" ; ! n=1/16 [0/145429]
asâm-/:asâm/ -âhtikw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/16 [1/145429]
asâm-/:asâm/ -ê2 "weight: 18.750937" ; ! n=9/16 [3/145429]
asâm-/:asâm/ -êyâpiy "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/16 [1/145429]
asâm-+Der/N:asâm NA "weight: 18.095530" ; ! n=2/16 (NA-1) [26/145429]

LEXICON asâsw-
asâsw-/:asâsw/ -iwê "weight: 30.009073" ; ! n=3/7 [0/145429]
asâsw-/:asâsw/ -o "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=4/7 [0/145429]

LEXICON asê-
asê-/:asê/ -akocin2 "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -akotê2 "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -ciw- "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -ciwan "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -ht2 "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -hâ "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -kâpawi "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/65 [2/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -mak- "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -makan "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -n1 "weight: 17.022893" ; ! n=8/65 [19/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -oht- "weight: 17.259282" ; ! n=4/65 [30/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -ohtah "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/65 [1/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -ohtê "weight: 17.986331" ; ! n=2/65 [29/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -pahtâ "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -paýi "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=2/65 [6/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -paýiho "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/65 [5/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -piT "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/65 [1/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -pit "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/65 [2/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -sin1 "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -skaw1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/65 [1/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -tis- "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=2/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -tisah "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -tisahw "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ -tâcimo "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ Câ(h)- "weight: 24.453533" ; ! n=4/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ ah- "weight: 25.839828" ; ! n=1/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ akot2- "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=2/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ ap- "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=2/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ api- "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=2/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ mâmiton- "weight: 24.453533" ; ! n=4/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ pakam- "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=2/65 [0/145429]
asê-/:asê/ wêp- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=6/65 [1/145429]
asê-/:asê/ y "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=2/65 [0/145429]

LEXICON asêsinw-
asêsinw-+Der/N:asêsinw NI "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/1 (NI-3) [3/145429]

LEXICON at-
at-/:at/ -S2 "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=4/21 [2/145429]
at-/:at/ -htê1 "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=4/21 [2/145429]
at-/:at/ -s2 "weight: 18.645576" ; ! n=5/21 [6/145429]
at-/:at/ -sw2 "weight: 17.569437" ; ! n=8/21 [11/145429]

LEXICON atah-
atah-/:atah/ -amaw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]

LEXICON atam-
atam-/:atam/ -h "weight: 17.402383" ; ! n=4/13 [26/145429]
atam-/:atam/ -m1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/13 [1/145429]
atam-/:atam/ -sk1 "weight: 26.110473" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
atam-/:atam/ -skaw1 "weight: 16.404867" ; ! n=6/13 [47/145429]
atam-/:atam/ -skotaw "weight: 26.110473" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]

LEXICON atamiskay-
atamiskay-+Der/N:atamiskay NI "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NI-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON ati-
ati-/:ati/ ay1- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/10 [3/145429]
ati-/:ati/ ayâ- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/10 [3/145429]
ati-/:ati/ iT- "weight: 18.714569" ; ! n=1/10 [28/145429]
ati-/:ati/ kis- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/10 [1/145429]
ati-/:ati/ miýw- "weight: 18.645576" ; ! n=2/10 [15/145429]
ati-/:ati/ mêst- "weight: 25.971887" ; ! n=1/10 [0/145429]
ati-/:ati/ otâkw- "weight: 19.481825" ; ! n=1/10 [13/145429]
ati-/:ati/ tipisk- "weight: 18.955731" ; ! n=1/10 [22/145429]
ati-/:ati/ wâsê- "weight: 25.971887" ; ! n=1/10 [0/145429]

LEXICON atihkamêkw-
atihkamêkw-+Der/N:atihkamêkw NA "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-3) [1/145429]

LEXICON atihkw-
atihkw-/:atihkw/ -is "weight: 17.546964" ; ! n=6/30 [15/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ -isis "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/30 [2/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ -kamikw "weight: 25.210532" ; ! n=2/30 [0/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ -min "weight: 25.903679" ; ! n=1/30 [0/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ -wayân "weight: 24.294241" ; ! n=5/30 [0/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ -âpêmakw "weight: 25.903679" ; ! n=1/30 [0/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ -ê2 "weight: 19.051042" ; ! n=2/30 [10/145429]
atihkw-+Der/N:atihkw NA "weight: 16.160670" ; ! n=6/30 (NA-3) [60/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ asiniy- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/30 [3/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ pîway- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/30 [1/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ w "weight: 25.903679" ; ! n=1/30 [0/145429]
atihkw-/:atihkw/ wiyâs- "weight: 25.210532" ; ! n=2/30 [0/145429]

LEXICON atim1-
atim1-/:atim/ -amon2 "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -hâ "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -kâpawi "weight: 26.389187" ; ! n=2/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -oht- "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/27 [5/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -ohtê "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/27 [5/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -pahtâ "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -paýi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -sin1 "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -skanaw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -skw1- "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -tiy- "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -tâp- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -tâpâso "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -wêw- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -wêwit "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/27 [1/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -wêwê "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -â4 "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -âp- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/27 [3/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -âpam "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/27 [3/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ -âpêk- "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ ap- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/27 [2/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ api- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/27 [2/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ ast- "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ astê- "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
atim1-/:atim/ pici- "weight: 27.082334" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 astâw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [2/145429]
0 astê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [266/145429]
0 asw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=18/27654 [46/145429]
0 asâkîw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 asâm- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [28/145429]
0 asâsw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=6/27654 [0/145429]
0 asê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=47/27654 [62/145429]
0 asêsinw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [3/145429]
0 at- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=14/27654 [16/145429]
0 atah- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [1/145429]
0 atam- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=12/27654 [74/145429]
0 atamiskay- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 ati- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=9/27654 [82/145429]
0 atihkamêkw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [1/145429]
0 atihkw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=9/27654 [22/145429]
0 atim1- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=20/27654 [16/145429]
LEXICON iT-
iT-/:iT/ astê- "weight: 16.397800" ; ! n=2/762 [142/145429]
iT-/:iT/ at- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/762 [2/145429]
LEXICON kaw-
kaw-/:kaw/ astê- "weight: 24.998438" ; ! n=1/102 [0/145429]
LEXICON mahk-
mahk-/:mahk/ astê- "weight: 27.013341" ; ! n=1/89 [0/145429]
mahk-/:mahk/ asâm- "weight: 27.013341" ; ! n=1/89 [0/145429]
LEXICON miýw-
miýw-/:miýw/ astê- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/374 [1/145429]
LEXICON mâý-
mâý-/:mâý/ astê- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/198 [1/145429]
mâý-/:mâý/ atihkw- "weight: 15.233329" ; ! n=14/198 [65/145429]
LEXICON nât-
nât-/:nât/ asâm- "weight: 23.883661" ; ! n=2/133 [0/145429]
LEXICON nîsw-
nîsw-/:nîsw/ astê- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/90 [3/145429]
LEXICON o(t)1-
o(t)1-/:ot/ asâm- "weight: 25.627047" ; ! n=1/54 [0/145429]
o(t)1-/:o/ asâm- "weight: 25.627047" ; ! n=1/54 [0/145429]
LEXICON o(t)2-
o(t)2-/:ot/ asâm- "weight: 24.606396" ; ! n=1/61 [0/145429]
o(t)2-/:o/ asâm- "weight: 24.606396" ; ! n=1/61 [0/145429]
o(t)2-/:ot/ asâsw- "weight: 24.606396" ; ! n=1/61 [0/145429]
o(t)2-/:o/ asâsw- "weight: 24.606396" ; ! n=1/61 [0/145429]
o(t)2-/:ot/ asê- "weight: 24.606396" ; ! n=1/61 [0/145429]
o(t)2-/:o/ asê- "weight: 24.606396" ; ! n=1/61 [0/145429]
LEXICON oht-
oht-/:oht/ astê- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/149 [3/145429]
LEXICON papâm-
papâm-/:papâm/ astê- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/116 [2/145429]
LEXICON pim-
pim-/:pim/ astê- "weight: 18.955731" ; ! n=2/326 [11/145429]
LEXICON têp-
têp-/:têp/ astê- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/188 [1/145429]
LEXICON w
w/:w/ astê- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/598 [1/145429]
LEXICON wan-
wan-/:wan/ astê- "weight: 24.393515" ; ! n=1/154 [0/145429]
LEXICON wâp-
wâp-/:wâp/ atihkw- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/161 [3/145429]
LEXICON wîn-
wîn-/:wîn/ astê- "weight: 26.750977" ; ! n=1/83 [0/145429]
LEXICON âht-
âht-/:âht/ astê- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/103 [1/145429]
